Washington statutes.
RCW 35.02.100

Election on question of incorporation—Notice—Contents.

The notice of election on the question of the incorporation shall be given as provided by RCW 29A.52.355 and shall describe the boundaries of the proposed city or town, its name, and the number of inhabitants ascertained by the county legislative authority or the boundary review board to reside in it.

[ 2015 c 53 s 18; 1986 c 234 s 13; 1965 c 7 s 35.02.100. Prior: 1957 c 173 s 9; prior: 1953 c 219 s 5; 1890 p 131 s 2, part; 1888 p 221 ss 1, 2, part; 1877 p 173 ss 1, 2, part; 1871 p 51 s 1, part; RRS s 8884, part.]